California statutes. Education Code
(1) Terms providing for the return to the General Fund by no later than January 1, 2013, of moneys appropriated to the Governor’s Scholarship Programs that are not anticipated to be needed to make awards pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a).

(2) Provisions that authorize the board to pay agreed-upon early withdrawal penalties or fees.

(3) Terms that extend to the final date upon which the board may withdraw funds for a person who earned an award under the Governor’s Scholarship Programs.

(e) (1) If funds retained in the Golden State Scholarshare Trust after January 1, 2013, are insufficient to cover the remaining withdrawal requests, it is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate the necessary funds to the Golden State Scholarshare Trust for the purpose of funding individual beneficiary accounts.

(2) The board shall notify the Department of Finance and the Legislature no later than 10 working days after determining that a shortfall in available funding described in paragraph (1) will occur.

(f) (1) (A) Of the funds transferred to the General Fund pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), five million dollars ($5,000,000) is hereby
 appropriated to the Chancellor of the California State University, without regard to fiscal years, to fund the establishment and administration of the California Open Education Resources Council and the California Digital Open Source Library, and the development or acquisition of open education resources, or any combination thereof, pursuant to legislation enacted in the 2011–12 Regular Session of the Legislature,
 provided that the chancellor may provide reimbursement to the California Community Colleges and the University of California for costs those segments, or their representatives, incur in association with the activities described in this paragraph.

(B) Effective January 1, 2016, three million dollars ($3,000,000) of the moneys appropriated pursuant to this paragraph are hereby reappropriated pursuant to paragraph (4).

(2) Except those moneys allocated pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (4), moneys, or a portion of moneys, appropriated pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not be
 encumbered unless at least 100 percent of that amount encumbered is matched by private funds and, if not matched by private funds, shall revert to the Golden State Scholarshare Trust for purposes of the Governor’s Scholarship Programs.

(3) Of the unencumbered amount appropriated pursuant to paragraph (1) as of June 30, 2015:

(A) Up to two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) may
 be used for administration of the California Open Online Library for Education. These funds may be used by the California Open Online
 Library for Education to continue developing and updating its services to provide faculty, staff, and students convenient access to open educational resources as course materials and to provide administrative support for the California Open Educational Resources Council. These funds may be used by the California Open Online Library for Education for purposes of the Open Educational Resources and Adoption Incentive Program until September 1, 2020.

(B) Up to twenty-seven thousand dollars ($27,000) may be used for stipends to members of the California Open Education Resources Council for these members to carry out their duties in accordance with the Open Educational Resources Adoption Incentive Program.

(4) Of the funds transferred to the General Fund
 pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) and appropriated pursuant to paragraph (1), three million dollars ($3,000,000) is hereby reappropriated to the Chancellor of the California State University, without regard to fiscal years, for allocation for the Open Educational Resources Adoption Incentive Program.

(g) The board may adopt rules and regulations for the implementation of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 633, Sec. 2.   (AB 798)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

69999.7.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, not later than 30 days after enactment of the Budget Act of 2004, the Scholarshare Investment Board shall transfer from the Golden State Scholarshare Trust to the General Fund the lesser of (1) fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) or (2) the balance resulting from unclaimed awards in the Golden State Scholarshare Trust that exceeds five million dollars ($5,000,000) as of the close of business on the business day preceding the transfer.

(b) The amount remaining in the Golden State Scholarshare Trust after the transfer required by subdivision (a) shall be available as a reserve for funding claims for these awards. If claims for these awards exceed four million dollars ($4,000,000) of the reserve established by this act in the Golden State Scholarshare Trust, the Scholarshare Investment Board shall notify the Controller of the amount of any shortfall of funds for the payment of claims, and the Controller shall transfer an amount of money equal to the shortfall from the General Fund to the Golden State Scholarshare Trust.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 227, Sec. 15.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

69999.8.

As used in this article:

(a) “Board” means the Scholarshare Investment Board established pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 69984.

(b) “Former Article 20” means former Article 20 (commencing with Section 69995) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of the Education Code, as it read on January 1, 2003.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 227, Sec. 15.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 20.7. California Military Department GI Bill Award Program [69999.10. - 69999.28.]

69999.10.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Military Department GI Bill.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 547, Sec. 2.   (AB 2722)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Article conditionally operative as provided in Section 69999.28.)
-------------------------------------------

69999.12.

There is hereby established the California Military Department GI Bill Award Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 547, Sec. 3.   (AB 2722)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Article conditionally operative as provided in Section 69999.28.)
-------------------------------------------

69999.14.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The California Military Department exists to provide a military organization in California with the capability to protect the lives and property of the people of the state during periods of natural disaster and civil disturbances, and to perform other functions required by the Military and Veterans Code or as directed by the Governor.

(b) The California Military Department performs an essential public purpose in protecting the health, safety, and property of California’s citizens and, in order to fulfill its objectives, it is necessary for the California Military Department to have sufficient service members to deal with natural or human-caused disasters and
 emergencies.

(c) The state-sponsored education benefit is an important tool used to ensure that the California Military Department attracts and retains highly competent and capable service members who stand ready to immediately respond to the state’s call.

(d) The California Military Department GI Bill is an investment in the men and women who serve California faithfully. This incentive ensures that members of the California National Guard and the California State Guard are not placed at an educational disadvantage when compared to their active duty or reserve component counterparts.

(e) The Legislature
 and the California Military Department believe that every service member who takes the oath to serve this great state needs to be afforded the best opportunity to achieve a higher education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 97, Sec. 7.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Article conditionally operative as provided in Section 69999.28.)
-------------------------------------------

69999.16.

(a) Commencing January 1 of the 2009–10 academic year, and each academic year thereafter, any qualifying member of the California National Guard, the State Guard, or the Naval Militia may apply for an award under the California Military Department GI Bill.

(b) (1) A qualifying member shall meet all of the following conditions to be eligible to receive a California Military Department GI Bill award:

(A) The person is a resident within the meaning of Section
 68017.

(B) The person is an active member of the California National Guard, the
 State Guard, or the Naval Militia.

(C) The person has been accepted or registered at, or enrolled in, a qualifying institution, as defined in subdivision (l) of Section 69432.7.

(D) The person agrees to use the award to obtain a certificate, degree, or diploma that the person does not hold at the time the person applies for the award, and enrolls in at least three academic units per semester, or the equivalent thereof. The award may be used to
 obtain one baccalaureate, graduate, or doctoral degree. The award may be used for a certificate, degree, or diploma that leads to a baccalaureate, graduate, or doctoral degree.

(E) The person agrees to serve two years in the California National Guard, the Naval Militia, or the California State Guard upon completion of the last academic period that the person uses educational assistance under this program.

(F) The person agrees to complete
 their
 course of study within 10 years of the person’s initial acceptance into the program. If a person is unable to complete their course of study in the 10-year period due to federal military activation or other unexpected circumstance, the Adjutant General of the California Military Department may extend that person’s participation in the program for a period of up to five additional years.

(G) The person has submitted the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) to the United States Department of Education.

(2) To be eligible for an award for a summer session term, a qualifying member who meets the conditions in paragraph (1) shall submit a letter from
 the member’s unit commander that states that the member’s enrollment in that summer session will not adversely impact the member’s attendance at mandatory military training.

(c) Each person applying for a California Military Department GI Bill award shall submit an application for an award to the Adjutant General.

(d) The Adjutant General shall do all of the following:

(1) Annually identify the skills most needed by the California National Guard to retain members who possess, or seek to possess, those identified skills.

(2) Prioritize those applicants who qualify for an award pursuant to subdivision (b) based on the skills most needed by the California National Guard, as identified pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) Select award recipients from among eligible applicants pursuant to subdivision (e).

(4) Certify the eligibility of applicants to the Student Aid Commission.

(5) Notify recipients of their selection for an award.

(e) The Adjutant General shall select recipients who have been judged by the Adjutant General to have outstanding ability on the basis of criteria that may include, but shall not be limited to, any of the following:

(1) The Military Occupational Specialty Code or the Air Force Specialty Code.

(2) An annual noncommissioned officer evaluation report or officer evaluation report of the preceding two years.

(3) A memorandum from the applicant’s commander recommending the applicant for the award.

(4) Commendations the applicant has received.

(5) An essay, written by the applicant, explaining why education is important to the applicant.

(f) The number of awards issued by the Student Aid Commission in any fiscal year shall be limited to the number authorized in the annual Budget Act for that year, but in no event shall exceed 1,000 in any fiscal year.

(g) The Student Aid Commission shall issue the awards in accordance with Section 69999.18.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 97, Sec. 8.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Article conditionally operative as provided in Section 69999.28.)
-------------------------------------------

69999.18.

(a) The Student Aid Commission is responsible for issuing awards authorized by Section 69999.16, upon receipt of a certificate from the Adjutant General verifying that the applicant meets the eligibility requirements of this article. The commission shall provide any information to the Military Department that is necessary to meet the reporting requirements of Section 69999.24.

(b) The amount of an award issued pursuant to this article shall be as follows:

(1) For a recipient attending the University of California or the California State University, the maximum amount of the Cal Grant A award, pursuant to Section 66021.2,
 as adjusted in the annual Budget Act.

(2) For a recipient attending a community college, the maximum amount of the Cal Grant B award, pursuant to Section 66021.2, as adjusted in the annual Budget Act.

(3) For a recipient attending a nonpublic institution, the maximum amount of a Cal Grant A award for a student attending the University of California pursuant to Section 66021.2, as adjusted in the annual Budget Act.

(c) An award used for graduate studies shall not exceed the maximum amount of a Cal Grant A award, as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(d) The award amount under subdivisions (b) and (c) shall not exceed the difference between
 the recipient’s cost of attendance and any other student financial aid and educational benefits pursuant to the federal Montgomery GI Bill (38 U.S.C. Sec. 3001 et seq.) or any other federal educational benefits program for veterans.

(e) California Military Department GI Bill awards may be renewed for each new academic year, for a maximum of the greater of either (1) four years of full-time equivalent enrollment or (2) the duration for which the qualifying member would otherwise be eligible pursuant to the Cal Grant Program (Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430)), if the Adjutant General certifies the qualifying member’s eligibility and the qualifying member maintains at least a 2.0 cumulative grade point average.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 547, Sec. 6.   (AB 2722)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Article conditionally operative as provided in Section 69999.28.)
-------------------------------------------

69999.20.

Qualifying members shall not receive both a California Military Department GI Bill award and any Cal Grant award for the same academic year. A qualifying member under this article who is also eligible for a Cal Grant award may elect between an award under this article and any Cal Grant award for the same academic year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 547, Sec. 7.   (AB 2722)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Article conditionally operative as provided in Section 69999.28.)
-------------------------------------------

69999.22.

The Student Aid Commission, in consultation with the Military Department, shall adopt emergency rules and regulations, pursuant to Section 11346.1 of the Government Code, for the purpose of administering this article. These rules and regulations shall include provisions that establish criteria for selecting award recipients, including priorities for allocating available money to applicants. The Student Aid Commission may solicit the advice of representatives from postsecondary educational institutions regarding any proposed rules and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 4.   Effective July 28, 2009.   Article conditionally operative as provided in Section 69999.28.)
-------------------------------------------

69999.23.

(a) Costs incurred by the Student Aid Commission for issuing and processing awards shall be reimbursed through an interagency agreement from appropriations in the annual Budget Act to the Military Department for purposes of this article.

(b) The Student Aid Commission may enter into contracts with a public agency or a private entity to improve the processing and distribution of awards through the use of electronic networks and unified databases.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 4.   Effective July 28, 2009.   Article conditionally operative as provided in Section 69999.28.)
-------------------------------------------

69999.24.

The Student Aid Commission shall report annually to the Legislature regarding program participation, including, but not necessarily limited to, both of the following, as categorized on the basis of age, ethnicity, and gender:

(a) The total number of participants in the program established by this article.

(b) The number of participants who receive a California Military Department GI Bill award, classified by academic year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 547, Sec. 8.   (AB 2722)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Article conditionally operative as provided in Section 69999.28.)
-------------------------------------------

69999.28.

This article shall become operative only upon an appropriation by the Legislature for the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 4.   Effective July 28, 2009.   Note: Contingent operation provision applies to Article 20.7, commencing with Section 69999.10.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 21. Governor’s Teaching Fellowships [70000. - 70005.]

70000.

(a) The Governor’s Teaching Fellowships Program is hereby established to be administered by the Chancellor’s office of the California State University. The chancellor’s office shall collaborate with the University of California, the California Community Colleges, the Association of Independent California Colleges and Universities, the State Department of Education, and the Commission on Teacher Credentialing to ensure that access to the fellowships is available to students in a variety of teaching preparation programs.

(b) In January 2001, 250 nonrenewable graduate teaching fellowships in the amount of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) each shall be awarded, with funds disbursed one-half in January 2001 and one-half in September 2001.

(c) During the 2001–02 fiscal year, 1,000 nonrenewable, graduate teaching fellowships in the amount of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) each shall be awarded.

(d) Commencing with the 2002–03 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the number of fellowships awarded shall be determined pursuant to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act for this purpose.

(e) The fellowship award may be used to defer tuition for a teacher certification program at any accredited postsecondary institution in California and for living expenses while enrolled in that program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1167, Sec. 31.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

70001.

(a) The Chancellor’s office of the California State University shall have the following duties:

(1) Developing an application process that establishes a merit-based fellowship program for graduate students who agree to teach at a high-priority school for four years.

(2) Establishing a broad and effective outreach effort to promote the availability and the merits of the fellowship program.

(3) Conducting the selection process for fellowship applicants.

(4) Collaborating with the Commission on Teacher Credentialing to develop and implement a system for monitoring program participants through the completion of their four-year teaching obligation.

(5) Determining the criteria for selecting teaching fellowship candidates. The criteria shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(A) Previous academic and employment record.

(B) A demonstrated commitment to serve in a high-priority school.

(C) Faculty and employer evaluations.

(D) Interviews.

(E) Letters of recommendation.

(b) For the purposes of this article, a “high-priority school” is a school in the bottom half of the Academic Performance Index rankings established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 52056. If a school meets this criteria at the time a teacher is hired, continued employment of the teacher at that school fulfills the commitment made by the teacher, even if the school improves its rank on the Academic Performance Index.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 91, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

70002.

An intersegmental review committee is hereby established to review all applications for the Governor’s Teaching Fellowships. The committee shall recommend teaching fellowship candidates to the Chancellor’s office of the California State University. The committee shall consist of 12 members, appointed by the Governor to a term of four years, based on recommendations as follows:

(a) The Chancellor of the California State University shall recommend six members. Two shall be faculty members. One shall be an administrator from higher education. One shall be an administrator from a school maintaining kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive. Two shall be teachers from schools maintaining kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(b) The President of the University of California shall recommend three members. One shall be a faculty member. One shall be an administrator from either higher education or schools maintaining kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive. One shall be an elementary or secondary teacher.

(c) The Chair of the Association of Independent California Colleges and Universities shall recommend three members. One shall be a faculty member. One shall be an administrator from either higher education or schools maintaining kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive. One shall be an elementary or secondary teacher.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 70, Sec. 21.   Effective July 5, 2000.   Operative September 23, 2000, pursuant to Sec. 22 of Ch. 70.)
-------------------------------------------

70003.

(a) A fellowship recipient shall agree to teach in a high-priority school for four years and shall have four years, upon completion of his or her preparation program, to meet that obligation. Except as provided in subdivision (c), a fellowship recipient shall agree to repay the state five thousand dollars ($5,000) annually for each year the recipient fails to complete either the teacher preparation program or the required teaching service, up to full repayment of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

(b) Nonperformance of the commitment to teach in a high-priority school for four years shall be certified by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing to the chancellor’s office.

(c) Any exceptions to the requirement for repayment shall be defined by the chancellor’s office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 91, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

70004.

The Trustees of the California State University shall provide an annual report, for each higher education institution, on the number of fellows receiving funding, the number of fellows completing programs, and the place of employment for each candidate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 70, Sec. 21.   Effective July 5, 2000.   Operative September 23, 2000, pursuant to Sec. 22 of Ch. 70.)
-------------------------------------------

70005.

(a) The Chancellor’s office of the California State University shall adopt any rules and regulations it deems necessary for the administration of this section and the recovery of funds it determines are owed to the state. The rules and regulations adopted by the chancellor’s office pursuant to this section shall also include a provision authorizing the chancellor’s office to seek a civil penalty on a recipient of funds under this program, in an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) per year for each year that the recipient of funds is determined by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing to have failed to fulfill his or her obligation to teach in a high-priority school.

(b) Any moneys derived from the assessment of penalties pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 91, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 21.5. The California Memorial Scholarship Program [70010. - 70011.9.]

70010.

(a) The California Memorial Scholarship Program is hereby established. The program shall be administered by the Scholarshare Investment Board established pursuant to Section 69984. The program shall be funded by the California Memorial Scholarship Fund established pursuant to Section 5066 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) The purpose of the program is to provide scholarships for surviving dependents of California residents killed as a result of injuries sustained during the terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001. These scholarships shall be used to defray the costs incurred by participants in the program at institutions of higher education. The Legislature finds and declares that the scholarships provided by this act are funded by voluntary donations provided by California vehicle owners.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 78.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

70010.1.

As used in this article:

(a) “Board” means the Scholarshare Investment Board established pursuant to Section 69984.

(b) “California resident” means a person who would not be required to pay nonresident tuition under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 68000) of Part 41.

(c) “Dependent” means a person identified by the California Victim Compensation Board because of his or her relationship to a California resident killed as a result of injuries sustained during the terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001.

(d) “Fund” means the California Memorial Scholarship Fund established pursuant to Section 5066 of the Vehicle Code.

(e) “Institution of higher education” has the same meaning as “eligible educational institution,” as defined in paragraph (5) of subsection (e) of Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended by Section 211 of the Taxpayer Relief Act of 1997 (Public Law 105-34).

(f) “Participant” means a surviving dependent of a California resident killed as a result of injuries sustained during the terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001, who has executed, or on whose behalf has been executed, an agreement pursuant to Section 70011.

(g) “Program” means the California Memorial Scholarship Program established pursuant to Section 70010.

(h) “Scholarship” means a participant’s account as established by the board with moneys deposited in the fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 22.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

70010.5.

(a) The California Victim Compensation Board shall identify, and confirm by documentation, all persons who are eligible for scholarships under the program. The California Victim Compensation Board shall use various methods to identify those persons, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Media outreach, including, but not limited to, social media, that explains the details of the program, who is eligible for scholarships under the program, and how to sign up for further notifications regarding the program.

(2) Written notification to persons, or in the case of minors, their parents or guardians, who have previously been identified as
 eligible for scholarships under the program, and their known family members. The notification shall explain that the program has been reopened, and that the California Victim Compensation Board is seeking information regarding other persons who may be eligible for the program, and shall provide instructions on how to sign up for further notifications regarding the program.

(3) Communication with the Special Master of the federal September 11th Victim Compensation Fund to determine if additional victims who were California residents have been identified.

(b) After creating a new list of eligible persons for the program, the California Victim Compensation Board shall notify these persons or, in the case of minors, the parents or guardians of these persons, of their eligibility for scholarships under the program.

(1) The notification shall be in writing.

(2) The notification shall provide details on the program and how to apply for scholarships under the program.

(3) The notification shall be received by all of the appropriate persons no later than July 1, 2015.

(c) The Scholarshare Investment Board shall service scholarships pursuant to this article only for individuals determined to be eligible by the California Victim Compensation Board.

(d) Eligible persons, or in the case of minors, the parents or guardians of these persons, shall inform the Scholarshare Investment Board of their decision on whether to participate in the program in a timely manner. Eligible persons, or in the case of minors, the parents or guardians of these persons, who are to
 become participants in the program shall execute agreements pursuant to Section 70011 no later than July 1, 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 23.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

70010.7.

(a) (1) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall deposit the proceeds of the sale of California memorial license plates into the fund in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 5066 of the Vehicle Code. When an agreement is executed pursuant to Section 70011, the board shall establish an account within the fund for the benefit of a person eligible for the program.

(2) Distributions from the fund shall commence on July 1, 2005. After July 1, 2005, the total amount of moneys in the fund shall, at all times, be evenly divided among the accounts that are in existence at that time until the board has transferred five thousand dollars ($5,000) from the fund into each account. When five thousand dollars ($5,000) has been transferred by the board into each account, all revenues remaining in the fund shall be deposited into the Antiterrorism Fund created by paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 5066 of the Vehicle Code and distributed as provided in that paragraph. 

(b) Moneys in the fund, including moneys in the accounts, may be invested and reinvested by the board, or may be invested in whole or in part under contract with private money managers, as determined by the board. The interest earned shall accrue to the accounts.

(c) The board shall establish within the fund an administrative account, the amount deposited in which may not exceed 5 percent of the total amount of moneys in the fund. Funds in the administrative account may be used, upon appropriation in the annual Budget Act or in another statute, for the administrative costs of the board in administering the program.

(d) No moneys from the fund may be encumbered, and no distribution may be made from any account in the fund, unless and until an appropriation authorizing that encumbrance or distribution is made in the annual Budget Act or in another statute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 406, Sec. 9.   Effective September 9, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

70011.

(a) The board may enter into agreements with participants or with persons entitled to act on behalf of participants.

(b) An agreement shall specify that any moneys remaining in an account after the 30th birthday of the participant, or not later than July 1, 2026, whichever occurs last, shall revert to the Antiterrorism Fund established under paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 5066 of the Vehicle Code. The agreements may also include, but need not be limited to, the terms and subject matter set forth in Section 69983.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 242, Sec. 2.   (SB 384)   Effective August 22, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

70011.3.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize or require the admission of a participant into a specific institution of higher education or degree program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 38, Sec. 1.   Effective May 13, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

70011.5.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of state law, any funds awarded pursuant to this article shall augment and not supplant student financial aid from other state sources. All calculations for eligibility for student financial aid from other state sources shall be made without consideration of any funds awarded pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 38, Sec. 1.   Effective May 13, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

70011.7.

Within the annual report required pursuant to Section 69989, the board shall also include information on the operation of the program. This information shall include, but need not be limited to, data on the number of agreements executed during the year, the date on which each agreement is executed, the age of each participant, the amount and number of distributions made from accounts within the fund, and the rate of return on the funds invested under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 406, Sec. 11.   Effective September 9, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

70011.9.

(a) The board may adopt regulations for the purposes of this article as emergency regulations in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). For the purposes of the Administrative Procedure Act, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of the regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, or general welfare, notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code, any regulation adopted pursuant to this section shall not remain in effect more than one year unless the board complies with rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, as required by subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 38, Sec. 1.   Effective May 13, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 22. Middle Class Scholarship Program [70020. - 70023.]

70020.

The Middle Class Scholarship Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury. Moneys in the fund shall be allocated, in accordance with this article, to make higher education more affordable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 50, Sec. 2.   (AB 94)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

70021.

The Middle Class Scholarship Program is hereby established under the administration of the Student Aid Commission. For purposes of this article, “commission” means the Student Aid Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 50, Sec. 2.   (AB 94)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

70022.

(a) (1) Subject to an available and sufficient appropriation, an undergraduate student enrolled in the California State University or the University of California, or a community college student enrolled in upper division coursework of a community college baccalaureate program, described in Article 3 (commencing with Section 78040) of Chapter 1 of Part 48 of Division 7, who meets the requirements of paragraph (3) is eligible for a scholarship award as described in paragraph (2).

(2) (A) For the 2013–14 to the 2021–22 academic year, inclusive, except as provided in paragraphs (4) and (5), an eligible student shall receive a scholarship award in an amount that, combined with other federal, state, or institutionally
 administered student grants or fee waivers received by an eligible student, is up to 40 percent of the amount charged to that student in that academic year for mandatory systemwide tuition and fees, or for an eligible community college student, up to 40 percent of the amount charged to that student in upper division fees for a community college baccalaureate degree program, if all of the requirements in paragraph (3) are met, to the satisfaction of the commission, each academic year.

(B) For the 2022–23 academic year, except as provided in paragraph (5), an eligible student shall receive a scholarship award in an amount that equals the difference between their cost of attendance as determined by the commission and the sum of the following amounts:

(i) Other federal, state, and institutionally administered student scholarships, grants, or fee waivers, and the amount of private
 scholarships awarded to the student in excess of the sum of the amounts in clauses (ii) and (iii).

(ii) Seven thousand eight hundred ninety-eight dollars ($7,898), reflecting an expected student contribution toward cost of attendance from work earnings or other resources.

(iii) Notwithstanding Section 69506, for dependent students with an annual household income exceeding one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), 33 percent of the parents’ contribution from adjusted available income, as determined using the federal methodology established by Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1087mm et seq.), and applicable rules and regulations adopted by the commission.

(C) For the 2023–24 academic year, except as provided in paragraph (5), an eligible student shall receive a scholarship
 award in an amount that equals the difference between their cost of attendance as determined by the commission and the sum of the following amounts:

(i) Other federal, state, and institutionally administered student scholarships, grants, or fee waivers.

(ii) The amount of private grants and scholarships awarded to the student, and institutionally awarded emergency housing funds and other basic needs emergency assistance awarded to the student, including emergency assistance awarded by an institution-based foster youth support program, in excess of the sum of the amounts in clauses (iii) and (iv).

(iii) Seven thousand eight hundred ninety-eight dollars ($7,898), reflecting an expected student contribution toward cost of attendance from work earnings or other resources.

(iv) Notwithstanding Section 69506, for dependent students with an annual household income exceeding one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), 33 percent of the parents’ contribution from adjusted available income, as determined using the federal methodology established by Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1087mm et seq.), and applicable rules and regulations adopted by the commission.

(D) Commencing with the 2024–25 academic year, except as provided in paragraph (5), an eligible student shall receive a scholarship award in an amount that equals the difference between their cost of attendance as determined by the commission and the sum of the following amounts:

(i) Other federal, state, and institutionally administered student need-based scholarships, grants, or fee
 waivers.

(ii) The amount of private grants and scholarships awarded to the student, and institutionally administered non-need-based scholarships and institutionally awarded emergency housing funds or other basic needs emergency assistance awarded to the student, including emergency assistance awarded by an institution-based foster youth support program, in excess of the sum of the amounts in clauses (iii) and (iv).
